Utah statutes.
16-16-1213.   Denial of reinstatement -- Appeal.

(1)  If the division denies a limited cooperative association's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the division shall prepare and file a notice that explains the reason for denial and serve the association with a copy of the notice.

(2)  Not later than 30 days after service of a notice of denial of reinstatement by the division, a limited cooperative association may appeal the denial by petitioning the district court to set aside the dissolution.  The petition shall be served on the division and contain a copy of the division's declaration of dissolution, the association's application for reinstatement, and the division's notice of denial.

(3)  The court may summarily order the division to reinstate the dissolved cooperative association or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

